Utah statutes.
41-1a-605.   Constructive notice.

(1)  If a person files an application in the form for an original certificate of title in accordance with Section 41-1a-602 within 30 days after the owner receives a delivery of the vehicle, vessel, or outboard motor, constructive notice dates from the time of the execution of the document creating the security interest, and the security interest takes priority over the rights of a buyer, lessee, or lien creditor which arise after the time of execution of the document creating the security interest.

(2)  If a person files an application in the form for an original certificate of title pursuant to Section 41-1a-602 after 30 days after the owner receives delivery of the vehicle, vessel, or outboard motor, constructive notice dates from the time of filing of the document creating the security interest, and the security interest takes priority over the rights of a buyer, lessee, or lien creditor as of the time of filing.

(3)  If a person relocates a motor vehicle within the state with a title issued by another state bearing a lien, the rights of the lienholder are perfected in accordance with the law of the state issuing the title.



Repealed and Re-enacted by Chapter 342, 2010 General Session

